Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-324
Stock; availability for purchase of real estate or payment of loan.

Any association, at the discretion of its officers and directors, and with the consent and approval of the Department of Banking and Finance, may accept its stock at the withdrawal value of such shares, to apply on the purchase at its fair market value, of any real estate owned by such association, or to apply in payment or reduction of any loans or contracts of sale on which, in the judgment of the officers and directors, there may be an eventual loss, whether or not notice for withdrawal of such shares shall have been filed, and such action shall not be considered prejudicial to the rights of any stockholders to whom payment on withdrawal notices is being delayed.

Laws 1933, c. 25, § 1, p. 199;

Laws 1935, c. 14, § 3, p. 86;

Laws 1937, c. 14, § 1, p. 120;

Laws 1941, c. 90, § 32, p. 359;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-309;

Laws 1943, c. 14, § 1(6), p. 80;

R.S.1943, § 8-324.